Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202579-3806
Schools and educational institutions; adopt policy; requirements.

The governing body of each public school and public postsecondary educational institution and each private school and private postsecondary educational institution subject to the Stand With Women Act shall adopt a policy implementing the Stand With Women Act. Such policy shall include provisions regarding the conduct of visitors and the public.

Laws 2025, LB89, § 6.